Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,108
Board of Parole; reduction of sentence
for good conduct; provisions; forfeiture.

(1) The board shall
reduce, for good conduct in conformity with the conditions of parole, a parolee's
parole term by ten days for each month of
such term. The total of such reductions shall be deducted from the maximum
term, less good time granted pursuant to section 83-1,107, to determine the
date when discharge from parole becomes mandatory.

(2) Reductions of the parole terms may be forfeited, withheld, and restored
by the board after the parolee has been consulted regarding any charge of
misconduct or breach of the conditions of parole.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 39, p. 3092;

Laws 1972, LB 1499, § 8;

Laws 1975, LB 567, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 816, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB191, § 2.

Sentencing judge's announcement he considered possible effect of statutes permitting prison authorities to ameliorate sentences did not violate constitutional due process, and sentences were not excessive. State v. Houston, 196 Neb. 724, 246 N.W.2d 63 (1976).

"Good time" under this section should not be applied against a mandatory minimum sentence imposed under section 29-2221(1). Hurbenca v. Nebraska Dept. of Corr. Servs., 16 Neb. App. 222, 742 N.W.2d 773 (2007).